District of Columbia statutes.
28-5101

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Art dealer” means a person engaged in the business of selling works of fine art other than a person exclusively engaged in the business of selling goods at public auction.

(2)

“Artist” means the creator of a work of fine art.

(3)

“On consignment” means delivered to an art dealer for the purpose of sale or exhibition to the public by the art dealer other than at a public auction.

(4)

“Work of fine art” means an original art work which is:

(A)

A visual rendition, including a painting, drawing, sculpture, mosaic, or photograph;

(B)

A work of calligraphy;

(C)

A work of graphic art, including an etching, lithograph, offset print, or silk screen;

(D)

A craft work in materials, including clay, textile, fiber, wood, metal, plastic, or glass; or

(E)

A work in mixed media, including a collage or a work consisting of any combination of subparagraphs (A) through (D) of this paragraph.

Mar. 12, 2011, D.C. Law 18-310, § 2, 57 DCR 12392